California statutes. Education Code
(2) A school district that experienced a loss of units of average daily attendance due to extenuating circumstances may not claim or report an increase in average daily attendance in excess of that authorized pursuant to this article during the previous fiscal year multiplied by a factor equivalent to the number derived by adding 1.025 to the extenuating circumstances factor, as defined pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) For purposes of this section, “a school district or county office of education
 that experienced a loss of average daily attendance due to extenuating circumstances” means a school district or county office of education that experienced a loss of average daily attendance as a result of the temporary or permanent closure of jails, a jail, or a unit thereof, that occurred on or after June 30, 1993, at which the district or office provided jail education programs that were subject to reimbursement by the state.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2), “extenuating circumstances factor” means that number derived by dividing the number of units of average daily attendance lost to circumstances defined in paragraph (3) divided by the number of units of average daily attendance claimed in the fiscal year prior to the extenuating circumstances occurring, provided that the factor does not exceed 0.115.

(5) Any school district or county office of education claiming
 additional average daily attendance pursuant to the “extenuating circumstances factor” defined in paragraph (4) shall document the extenuating circumstances and the data involved in calculating their extenuating circumstances factor. This subdivision shall apply only to average daily attendance generated in the 2000–01 fiscal year.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 46191, commencing with the 2001-02 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, for purposes of Sections 1909 and 41841.5, in calculating the average daily attendance for schools or classes for adults in correctional facilities, a school district or county board of education may not claim or report any increase in average daily attendance in excess of the average daily attendance authorized pursuant to this article during the previous fiscal year multiplied by 1.025, unless the Legislature approves a greater increase for that fiscal year in the
 annual Budget Act.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), for the 2003–04 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, a school district or county office of education shall calculate the maximum average daily attendance it may claim for schools and classes for adults in correctional facilities for the then-current fiscal year by multiplying the maximum average daily attendance that it would have been authorized to claim for those programs, without regard to actual average daily attendance, for the immediately preceding fiscal year by 1.025, or a greater increase if approved by the Legislature for that fiscal year in the annual Budget Act or other measure.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide, through subsequent measures, additional adjustments to increase allocations for adults in correctional facility educational programs to the extent that funds are available.

(e) No state funds shall be allocated to a school district or county board of education for units of average daily attendance for programs set forth in this section unless the allocations are in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1067, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

41841.8.

Notwithstanding Sections 1909 and 41841.5, or any other provision of law, commencing with the 1994–95 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, any school district or county superintendent of schools that did not maintain schools or classes for adults in correctional facilities in the 1993–94 fiscal year and that subsequently offers those schools or classes shall not claim, or receive apportionments for, more than 20 units of average daily attendance for the first year in which the school district or county superintendent of schools offers those
 classes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 670, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Allowances for Transportation [41850. - 41851.1.]

41850.

(a) Apportionments made pursuant to this article shall only be made for home-to-school transportation and special education transportation, as defined in this section.

(b) As used in this article, “home-to-school transportation” includes all of the following:

(1) The transportation of pupils between their homes and the regular full-time day school they attend, as provided by a school district or county superintendent of schools.

(2) The payment of moneys by a school district or county superintendent of schools to parents or guardians of pupils made in lieu of providing for the transportation of pupils between their homes and the regular full-time day schools they attend.

(3) Providing board and lodging to pupils by a school district or county superintendent of schools made in lieu of providing for the transportation of pupils between their homes and the regular full-time day schools they attend.

(4) The transportation of pupils between the regular full-time day schools they would attend and the regular full-time occupational training classes they attend, as provided by a regional occupational center or program.

(5) The transportation of individuals with exceptional needs as specified in their individualized education programs, who do not receive special education transportation as defined in subdivision (d).

(6) The payment of moneys by a school district or county superintendent of schools for the replacement or acquisition of schoolbuses.

(c) For purposes of this article, the computation of the allowances provided to a regional occupational center or program shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) A regional occupational center or program shall receive no allowance for 50 percent of the total transportation costs.

(2) A regional occupational center or program shall be eligible for a transportation allowance only if the total transportation costs exceed 10 percent of the total operational budget of the regional occupational center or program.

(3) A regional occupational center or program eligible for a transportation allowance pursuant to paragraph (2) shall receive an amount equal to one-third of the transportation costs subject to reimbursement.

(d) As used in this article, “special education transportation” means either of the following:

(1) The transportation of severely disabled special day class pupils, and orthopedically impaired pupils who require a vehicle with a wheelchair lift, who received transportation in the prior fiscal year, as specified in their individualized education program.

(2) A vehicle that was used to transport special education pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 14.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

41850.1.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall apportion to each school district and county superintendent of schools that provides pupil transportation services, a transportation allowance equal to 60 percent of the home-to-school transportation expenditures reported by the school district or county superintendent of schools, as determined by its Function 3600 entry in the Standardized Account Code Structure (SACS) report, consistent with the definition in the California School Accounting Manual, for the prior year, excluding capital outlay and nonagency expenditures. This allowance shall be reduced by the amount of the transportation add-on computed for the prior fiscal year under paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 42238.02 and
 adjusted under paragraph (3) of subdivision (h) of Section 42238.02 for a school district or subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 2574 and adjusted under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 2574 for a county superintendent of schools. If this reduction results in an amount less than zero, the transportation allowance under this section shall be zero.

(2) Home-to-school transportation expenditures reported for a school district with two component school districts under a common administration board pursuant to Section 35110 shall be divided among the component school districts in proportion to the transportation add-on amounts computed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 42238.02.

(3) For reorganized school districts, the prior fiscal year home-to-school transportation expenditures for purposes of paragraph
 (1) shall be determined as follows:

(A) A new school district shall be credited with the amount of eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures reported by each former school district before the reorganization. A new school district shall not be credited with eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures reported by divided school districts before the reorganization.

(B) An acquiring school district shall be credited with the amount of eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures it reported before the reorganization, plus the amount of eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures reported by each former school district before the reorganization. A new school district shall not be credited with eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures reported by divided school districts before the reorganization.

(C) The remaining portion of a divided school district shall be credited with eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures it reported before the reorganization.

(D) If the reorganization includes a former school district that has been wholly included in more than one new or acquiring school districts, the amount of eligible home-to-school transportation expenditures shall be determined in a manner consistent with the adjustments made to the transportation add-on specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 42238.02 pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35735.

(b) A local educational agency shall be subject to audits required by Section 41020 with respect to this section, including adoption of the transportation plan pursuant to Section 39800.1. The Controller shall include instructions appropriate to
 the enforcement of this section in the audit guide required by subdivision (a) of Section 14502.1.

(c) The department shall annually collect and publish transportation data from each local educational agency providing pupil transportation services and that receives an apportionment pursuant to this section. The data shall encompass ridership, miles driven, expenditure details, the number of pupils transported, the demographic characteristics of pupils transported, including race, ethnicity, and socioeconomic status, and other data facilitating comparisons among local educational agencies. The department shall determine the specific data elements in consultation with the Legislature and with local experts, including the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team established pursuant to Section 42127.8.

(d) As used in this section, “local educational agency” means a
 school district, excluding a school district with a districtwide charter petition approved pursuant to Section 47606, or county office of education that is providing school transportation services.

(e) School districts and county offices of education that provide transportation services by means of a joint powers agreement, a cooperative pupil transportation program, or a consortium shall receive transportation allowances pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 23.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41851.1.

(a) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, from Section A of the State School Fund, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall apportion to each school district or county superintendent of schools, as appropriate, an amount computed pursuant to this section. School districts and county superintendents of schools that provide transportation services by means of a joint powers agreement, a cooperative pupil transportation program, or a consortium shall receive transportation allowances pursuant to this section.

(b) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, each school district, joint powers agency, cooperative pupil transportation program, or consortium shall receive a transportation apportionment equal to the greater of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent of the prior year’s approved transportation costs.

(2) The prior year’s transportation allowance.

(c) For the 1989–90 fiscal year, each county office of education shall receive a transportation apportionment equal to the greater of the following:

(1) Eighty percent of the prior year’s approved transportation costs.

(2) The prior year’s transportation allowance.

(d) In the event that funds appropriated for the purposes of this section are not sufficient to fully fund the formula established by that section, the amounts apportioned shall be reduced on a proportionate basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 83, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Allowances for Handicapped Pupils [41880. - 41886.5.]

41880.

The provisions of this article shall supersede any other provisions of this code in conflict therewith. Allowances under this article shall be provided pursuant to regulations of the State Board of Education and standards and requirements established by the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 41891 by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1353, Sec. 23.   Effective September 30, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

41881.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each district participating in a regional occupational center or to each county superintendent of schools operating a regional occupational center, for each unit of average daily attendance attributable to a person educated in a regional occupational center or program pursuant to Section 52315, the following amounts:

(a) One thousand nine hundred fifty-five dollars ($1,955) for each person with a visual impairment.

(b) One thousand one hundred twenty dollars ($1,120) for each deaf person.

(c) Six hundred twenty dollars ($620) for each orthopedically impaired person.

The allowance prescribed by this section is in addition to other allowances or apportionments which may be received because of such attendance and can only be received if the specific service for which the allowance or apportionment is made is not otherwise provided by a community college within a reasonable commuting distance of the regional occupational center.

Each governing body maintaining a regional occupational center or program shall account for expenditures made on account of additional special instruction and support services pursuant to Section 52315. Expenditures shall be reported as an amount per pupil in average daily attendance in each of the categories specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c). If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that the expenditures, as reported, do not equal or exceed the allowances prescribed in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the amount of the deficiency shall be withheld from apportionments to the school district or the county superintendent of schools in the succeeding fiscal year in accordance with the procedure prescribed in Section 41341.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1288, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41886.5.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish procedures to limit the minimum number of students required to start a new special class as funded in Sections 41882, 41884, 41885, and 41886 and to proportionately reduce the class allowance for classes started after the beginning of the regular school year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Allowances for Excess Cost of Driver Training [41900. - 41919.]

41900.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each school district maintaining a high school or high schools, county superintendent of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education an amount equal to the actual cost, but not in excess of ninety-seven dollars ($97) per pupil instructed in the laboratory phase of driver education in accordance with Sections 41902 and 41905 and with regulations set forth by the State Board of Education to the districts, county superintendents of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education for instructing pupils in the laboratory phase of driver education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 924, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

41901.

The governing board of each school district maintaining a high school or high schools, each county superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education shall report annually to the county superintendent of schools and to the Superintendent of Public Instruction on forms provided by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the cost of instructing such pupils, and other information that may be required for the computation of the total direct and direct support cost incurred in the instruction of the pupils in automobile driver training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 334.)
-------------------------------------------

41902.

Allowances by the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be made only for driver training classes maintained in accordance with the rules and regulations as set forth by the State Board of Education.

Driver training may be made available to eligible students and, if made available, no tuition shall be charged. The governing board of a district maintaining a high school or high schools, the county superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education may make driver training available during school hours, or at other times, or any combination thereof.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102) by Stats. 1981, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

41903.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall determine the amount of total direct and direct support cost incurred by each school district, each county superintendent of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education during each current fiscal year for the establishment and maintenance of automobile driver training for pupils enrolled in the schools of the district, the county superintendent of schools, the Department of the Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education in accordance with regulations that he or she may prescribe.

“Total direct and direct support cost,” as used in this section, includes the total current expenditures incurred for instructing pupils in automobile driver training in special classes, including, but not limited to, automobile replacement, insurance, and upkeep and maintenance of automobiles used in the training. 

“Special classes,” as used in this section, includes classes providing automobile driver training for pupils who may be excused, for the purpose of taking instruction in automobile driver training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 924, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

41904.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may promote and direct the establishment and maintenance of courses of instruction in automobile driver education and driver training in the public schools. For this purpose, the superintendent may employ professional and other personnel as necessary to give full effect to this article. There is hereby established within the State Department of Education a unit for driver instruction to be comprised of three consultants and necessary support staff. All necessary costs and expenses incurred for purposes of this section shall be provided for from funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature from the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 924, Sec. 5.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 924.)
-------------------------------------------

41905.

No allowance shall be made under this article for the instruction of pupils in automobile driver training unless the school district, the county superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education has complied with the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education governing the establishment, conduct, and scope of automobile driver education and driver training, except that such rules and regulations shall not relate in any way to teacher certification or licensing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41906.

In applying for state reimbursement for driver training expenses incurred in the school year 1968–69 and thereafter, school districts, county superintendents of schools, the California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education shall certify to having met the requirements set forth in this article and, in addition, shall certify that all teachers used in the driver education or driver training programs are qualified instructors, as defined in Section 41907.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1045, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

41907.

A qualified instructor is one who has passed an approved driver’s instruction examination and holds a designated subjects credential or who holds a valid prior credential authorizing instruction in automobile driver education and driver training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1042, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41907.5.

(a) Any waiver granted by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing of the credentialing requirements specified in Section 41907 shall not extend beyond one year unless the individual to whom the waiver was granted demonstrates substantial progress toward meeting those credentialing requirements.

(b) This section shall be implemented only upon certification by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that it has developed alternative routes to coursework requirements authorized pursuant to Section 44260.7, and that reasonable opportunities exist for prospective credentialholders to receive this coursework.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1045, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

41908.

The governing board of any school district employing persons exclusively to teach driver training shall adopt and make public a salary schedule setting the daily or pay period rate or rates for such persons. Salary amounts and criteria for advancement contained in any salary schedule adopted pursuant to this section shall be established at the sole discretion of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41909.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make an additional allowance to each school district maintaining a high school or high schools, each county superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, and the State Department of Education as reimbursement for the actual expense of replacing vehicles used exclusively in automobile driver training programs and of replacing simulators used in such programs, but the amount shall not exceed three-fourths of that part of the actual cost of instructing pupils in automobile driver training during the preceding fiscal year which was: (1) in excess of eighty dollars ($80) per pupil instructed, and (2) expended by the district, the county superintendent of schools, California Youth Authority, or State Department of Education replacing the vehicles and simulators. Reimbursement for vehicle shall be computed for only that portion of the total mileage used exclusively in driver training programs.

For purposes of computing reimbursement, whenever a school district, a county superintendent of schools, the California Youth Authority, or the State Department of Education replaces a driver training vehicle or simulator purchased by the district, the county superintendent of schools, California Youth Authority, or Department of Education with a vehicle or simulator that is a gift or loan, the purchase price of the new or acquired equipment shall be deemed to be the market value of the vehicle or simulator acquired through a gift or loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 5.7.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

41910.

The Department of Education may grant waivers of automobile driver training education provisions of the Education Code for the purpose of establishing experimental driver education programs directed toward improving cost effectiveness in the reduction of traffic crashes. Waivers under this section shall not increase program reimbursements authorized pursuant to Sections 41304 and 41306.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41911.

The allowances made to the several school districts and county superintendents of schools, and to the California Youth Authority and Department of Education under Sections 41900 and 41909 shall, when the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that the funds credited to the Driver Training Penalty Assessment Fund during the preceding fiscal year will be insufficient to provide the full amounts otherwise allowable, be proportionately reduced.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41912.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) To assist in reducing the number of fatalities involving youthful drivers, a minimum standard of six hours of behind-the-wheel driver training conducted by a public or private secondary school, or by a qualified instructor of a licensed private driving school, shall be established.

(2) According to the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, traffic crashes are the number one killer of teenagers. Per mile driven, teenage drivers are involved in accidents four times as often as adults.

(3) According to the Center for Disease Control and Prevention, motor vehicle crashes are the leading cause of death among youths 16 to 20 years of age. Nationwide, about 6,000 youths 16 to 20 years of age, die each year in traffic accidents. Teenage drivers represent about 7 percent of the country’s population, but account for about 17 percent of the victims of fatal crashes.

(4) According to the Department of Motor Vehicles, during 1993, 4,163 people were killed and 315,184 were injured in traffic accidents across the state.

(5) According to the National Safety Council, driver error causes 69 percent of all automobile collisions. Annually, 11,900,000 accidents occur nationwide resulting in 2,000,000 injuries and 42,000 fatalities. Automobile accidents cost one hundred sixty-seven billion dollars ($167,000,000,000) annually.

(6) The Department of Motor Vehicles has introduced the first major revision of the driver’s license test since 1933, in recognition of a need to require first-time drivers to pass an examination representative of the complex driving conditions confronting motorists throughout the state. A minimum of six hours of behind-the-wheel driver training conducted by a public or private secondary school, or by a qualified instructor of a licensed private driving school, is required to prepare the first-time driver under 18 years of age to pass this examination.

(b) The expressed purpose of the Legislature is that highway accidents can and must be reduced through the education and training of drivers prior to licensing, and that this instruction properly belongs in the high school curriculum on a basis of having comparable standards of instruction, quality, teacher-pupil ratio and class scheduling in driver education as in other courses in the regular academic program. Only through a high quality program of driver instruction can the greatest potential in traffic accident prevention be realized. Further, the state has a responsibility to share in the reasonable costs of providing those courses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1045, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

41913.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of any school district maintaining secondary schools, may, subject to Sections 41913 to 41919, inclusive, enter into contracts with approved private driver training schools to provide to any or all of the eligible enrolled students of the district, the automobile driver training as provided pursuant to Section 51852. No such contract shall be valid unless approved by the governing board. The driver training provided under contract by an approved private driver training school shall be under the exclusive control and management of the governing board of the school district and shall comply with all rules and regulations of the State Board of Education relating to driver training offered by the public schools, except that a driver training instructor of the approved private driver training school shall not be required to possess any teaching credential or certification document of any kind except as required by the Driving School Department of the Department of Motor Vehicles. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the governing board from entering into contracts with more than one approved private driver training school and apportioning students among such schools.

Upon approval of the contract, the governing board shall transmit a copy of the signed contract to the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41914.

As used in this article, an “approved private driver training school” is one which:

(a) Has a valid license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11100) of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Maintains at all times limits of liability insurance established by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction equal to that required of the contracting school district.

(c) Provides, for such automobile driving instruction, dual-control automobiles approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(d) Meets such other requirements as shall be established by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41915.

Any contract entered into and approved in the manner provided pursuant to Section 41913 may entitle the approved driver training school to payment by the school district of the sum of not more than 150 percent of the amount reimbursable to the school district as “excess cost” provided pursuant to Sections 41306, 41900, and 41903. In the event that a student who has commenced the driver training for which the district has contracted pursuant to Section 41913 and the student does not complete the driver training for any reason, the approved private driver training school may be paid a portion of the contract price which is proportionate to the amount in “excess cost,” if any, received by the school district for such student, compared to the amount the district would have received had the student completed the training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 358.)
-------------------------------------------

41916.

Upon presentment to the governing board by the approved private driver training school written verification of the name, school, dates, and times of each automobile driver training instruction lesson and such other information required by the governing board, the approved private driver training school shall be paid the contract amount as determined pursuant to Section 41915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 652, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

41917.

The governing board of any school district shall be entitled to reimbursement for driver training provided by approved private driver training schools pursuant to this article in the amount authorized pursuant to Section 41900, upon certifying to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the number of pupils for whom automobile driver training instruction lessons was provided pursuant to Sections 41913 to 41919, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41918.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 41907, a regular employee of a contracting approved private driver training school shall be a qualified instructor for automobile driver training provided that:

(a) He holds a valid driver instructor license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, and

(b) He has completed the driver instructor course required by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41919.

No approved private driver training school may enter into a contract pursuant to this article unless it has, at the time of entering into the contract, been operating in the State of California for at least 24 consecutive months.

A contracting approved private driver training school shall provide instruction pursuant to one of the plans authorized pursuant to Section 51852.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Allowances for Project Connected Pupils [41930. - 41936.]

41930.

As used in this article the term “project” means any major, localized, undertaking by or under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Water Resources, or by or under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Water Resources and the federal government, jointly, which has a duration, estimated by the Director of the Department of Water Resources, of more than three years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41931.

A project-connected pupil, as used in this article, means a child of a parent, guardian, or other person standing in loco parentis who has enrolled in the regular full-time day schools of the district subsequent to the commencement of a project, whose parent or guardian is employed by a contractor or subcontractor in connection with the project, or by the State of California whose work is in connection with the project, and which child is in addition to the number of children who would otherwise normally be expected to be in the district.

The identification of project-connected pupils shall be subject to the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction in accordance with regulations that he is herewith authorized to adopt. The records identifying and accounting for the attendance of project-connected children shall be prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41932.

For the 1964–1965 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each eligible district, for each unit of average daily attendance in the regular full-time day schools of the district during the preceding fiscal year of project-connected pupils, as project-connected pupils are defined in Section 41931, an amount equal to the foundation program of the district, any supplemental amount computed under the Education Code, less basic state aid, and state equalization aid for the preceding fiscal year, divided by the second period average daily attendance of the district for the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41933.

The units of average daily attendance of project-connected pupils, as defined in Section 41931 for a fiscal year shall be computed by dividing the total number of days of attendance of such pupils by the number of days school was actually taught in the regular day schools of the district during the fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41934.

A district shall be eligible for an allowance under Section 41932 if the average daily attendance of project-connected pupils is at least 10 in the district during the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41935.

For the purposes of this article, pupils in grades 7 and 8 attending a junior high school maintained by a high school district shall be deemed to be in attendance in the schools of the elementary district of residence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41936.

Amounts allowed pursuant to this article shall be apportioned by the Superintendent of Public Instruction at the same time and as a part of the special purpose apportionment made under the provisions of Section 41334, whichever is in effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Allowances to County School Tuition Funds [41950. - 41950.]

41950.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to each county school tuition fund one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each unit of average daily attendance of pupils residing in the county and attending school in an adjoining state during the fiscal year. Such average daily attendance shall not be included in the computations provided for in Section 41761.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Allowances for Severance Aid [41960. - 41964.]

41960.

Whenever real property within a school district is acquired for state highway purposes, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to the school district an amount of severance aid as provided in this section, in addition to any other allowances provided by this chapter. For the five years following the acquisition of such property the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allow to the school district severance aid based on the amount of tax revenues the school district would have received from such property if there had been no such acquisition, computed as follows: for the year following such acquisition, the district shall be allowed the amount of tax revenues, except revenues for bond interest and redemption, which would have been paid during the year of acquisition if the taxes assessed on the property acquired were then paid in full; for the second year the district shall be allowed 80 percent of such amount; for the third year the district shall be allowed 60 percent of such amount; for the fourth year the district shall be allowed 40 percent of such amount; and for the fifth year the district shall be allowed 20 percent of such amount.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41962.

School districts may apply for severance aid as provided in this article on forms provided by the Superintendent, and in accordance with regulations that the Superintendent is authorized to adopt.
